Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB364.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3225(a)(1) introductory paragraph and (iii) and (2) of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3225. Bonding.(a) General rule.--The following shall apply:(1) Except as provided in subsection (d), upon filing an application for a well permit and before continuing to operate an oil or gas well, the owner or operator of the well shall file with the department a bond covering the well and well site on a form to be prescribed and furnished by the department. A bond filed with an application for a well permit shall be payable to the Commonwealth and conditioned upon the operator's faithful performance of all drilling, 1234567891011121314151617 water supply replacement, restoration and plugging requirements of this chapter. A bond for a well in existence on April 18, 1985, shall be payable to the Commonwealth and conditioned upon the operator's faithful performance of all water supply replacement, restoration and plugging requirements of this chapter. The amount of the bond required shall be in the following amounts and [amounts under subparagraphs (i) and (ii)] may be adjusted by the Environmental Quality Board every two years to reflect the projected costs to the Commonwealth of plugging the well:* * *(iii) For a well other than an unconventional well, $2,500 per well. [For 10 years following the effective date of this subparagraph, the Environmental Quality Board and the department shall have no authority to adjust the amount under this subparagraph.](2) The following apply:(i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii), in lieu of individual bonds for each well, an owner or operator may file a blanket bond for the applicable amount under paragraph (1)(i) or (ii), on a form prepared by the department, covering all of its wells in this Commonwealth, as enumerated on the bond form.(ii) As follows:(A) An operator may file a blanket bond of $25,000 for all of the operator's wells in this Commonwealth that are not unconventional wells.[(B) For every new well that is not an unconventional well drilled after six months after the effective date of this subsection, the bond 20250HB0364PN0320 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amount for that operator shall increase by $1,000.(C) The total blanket bond for an operator's wells that are not unconventional wells shall not exceed $100,000.(D) The blanket bond increase of $1,000 shall be waived by the department for a new well drilled under this subsection if the operator provides evidence to the department that the operator has plugged an orphan well at the operator's own expense for which the operator was not the responsible party within the previous 365 days that the operator has not yet received credit for under this subsection by the department.(E) For 10 years following the effective date of this clause, the bond amounts for wells that are not unconventional wells may only be revised by the General Assembly. The Environmental Quality Board and the department shall have no authority to adjust bond amounts related to wells that are not unconventional wells during that time period.](F) The department shall conduct a study of its experience in implementing this section, report its findings to the Governor and the General Assembly and make recommendations for program amendments within 12 months of the effective date of this clause. The report shall contain information relating to:(I) the cost to the Commonwealth to plug orphan and improperly abandoned wells;(II) evaluation of industry trends relating to compliance with plugging and reclamation 20250HB0364PN0320 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements under existing law;(III) evaluation of the effectiveness of existing enforcement authority in avoiding improper abandonment, including civil penalty authority and forfeiting oil and gas well bonds;(IV) the system for reviewing operators' requests for regulatory inactive status approval and permit transfers and what impact approving those actions under current requirements have on future improper abandonment of active wells;(V) the number of identified orphan and improperly abandoned wells eligible for plugging;(VI) any recommendation on effective alternative financial assurance mechanisms, including, but not limited to, increased bond amounts for conventional oil and gas wells; and(VII) the potential applicability of the mechanisms to oil and gas wells drilled prior to April 18, 1985.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0364PN0320 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021